Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1510
Hunters Helping the Hungry Cash Fund;
created; use; investment.

The Hunters Helping the Hungry Cash Fund is created. The
fund shall include amounts designated for the fund pursuant to section 37-1504
and revenue received from gifts, grants, bequests, donations, other similar
donation arrangements, or other contributions from public or private sources
intended for the fund. The fund shall be administered by the commission to
carry out the program. The annual expenditures from the fund shall be limited
only by the available balance of the fund. The commission shall not be obligated
to provide payments from the fund or pay any other expenses in excess of the
available balance in the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 14.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.